Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.670

Property division obligations—Direct payments pursuant to court order.

(1) Nothing in this chapter regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an obligee to direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy a property division obligation ordered pursuant to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation or any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation as provided in RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, 41.26.162, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070(4), 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, or 26.09.138, as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991. The department shall pay benefits under this chapter in a lump sum or as a portion of periodic retirement payments as expressly provided by the dissolution order. A dissolution order may not order the department to pay a periodic retirement payment or lump sum unless that payment is specifically authorized under the provisions of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.34, 41.40, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW, as applicable.

(2) The department shall pay directly to an obligee the amount of periodic retirement payments or lump sum payment, as appropriate, specified in the dissolution order if the dissolution order filed with the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section includes a provision that states in the following form:

If . . . . . . (the obligor) receives periodic retirement payments as defined in RCW 41.50.500, the department of retirement systems shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee) . . . . . . dollars from such payments or . . . percent of such payments. If the obligor's debt is expressed as a percentage of his or her periodic retirement payment and the obligee does not have a survivorship interest in the obligor's benefit, the amount received by the obligee shall be the percentage of the periodic retirement payment that the obligor would have received had he or she selected a standard allowance.

If . . . . . . (the obligor) requests or has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions as defined in RCW 41.50.500, or becomes eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department of retirement systems shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee) . . . . . . dollars plus interest at the rate paid by the department of retirement systems on member contributions. Such interest to accrue from the date of this order's entry with the court of record.

(3) This section does not require a member to select a standard allowance upon retirement nor does it require the department to recalculate the amount of a retiree's periodic retirement payment based on a change in survivor option.

(4) A court order under this section may not order the department to pay more than seventy-five percent of an obligor's periodic retirement payment to an obligee.

(5) Persons whose court decrees were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall also be entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders comply or are modified to comply with this section and RCW 41.50.680 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, and 26.09.138.

(6) The obligee must file a copy of the dissolution order with the department within ninety days of that order's entry with the court of record.

(7) A division of benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under this section shall be based upon the obligor's gross benefit prior to any deductions. If the department is required to withhold a portion of the member's benefit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and the sum of that amount plus the amount owed to the obligee exceeds the total benefit, the department shall satisfy the withholding requirements under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and then pay the remainder to the obligee. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to amounts withheld pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402(i).

[ 2004 c 242 s 51; 2002 c 158 s 5; 1998 c 341 s 513; 1996 c 39 s 18; 1991 c 365 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.